Hawaii statutes.
§183D-9 Federal aid in wildlife
restoration. The State assents to the provisions of the Pittman-Robertson
Federal Aid in Wildlife Restoration Act (50 Stat. 917, 16 U.S.C. §669), as
amended. The department shall perform those acts as may be necessary to the
conduct and establishment of cooperative wildlife restoration and management
projects, as defined in the Act of Congress and in compliance with the Act and
rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Interior thereunder;
provided that federal aid funds granted under the Act shall be used for the
purposes of approved projects, and no funds accruing to the State from license
fees paid by hunters shall be diverted for any purpose other than as provided
for in the Act and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. [L 1985,
c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next